midterm/final.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %<perf%>

%<o_sg1%> %<o_sg2%> %<o_sg3%> !objects, by number and person
%<o_pl1%> %<o_pl2%> %<o_pl3%>

%<s_sg1%> %<s_sg2%> %<s_sg3%> !subjects, by number and person
%<s_pl1%> %<s_pl2%> %<s_pl3%>

%<v%> %<tv%> !verb, transitive verb

%> !Morpheme Boundary

!Define Lexicons

LEXICON Root
object ;

LEXICON object
%<perf%>%<o_sg1%>:xi subjectXi ;
%<perf%>%<o_sg1%>:xin subjectXin ;
%<perf%>%<o_sg2%>:xat subject ;
%<perf%>%<o_sg3%>:x subjectX ;
%<perf%>%<o_pl1%>:xoj subjectXoj ;
%<perf%>%<o_pl2%>:xix subject ;
%<perf%>%<o_pl3%>:xe subjectXe ;

LEXICON subject
%<s_sg1%>:nu stem ;
%<s_sg3%>:ru stem ;
%<s_pl1%>:qa stem ;
%<s_pl3%>:ki stem ;

LEXICON subjectXi !To help limit overproduction
%<s_sg3%>:ru stem ;
%<s_pl2%>:ni stem ;


LEXICON subjectXin !To help limit overproduction
%<s_sg2%>:a stem ;
%<s_pl3%>:ki stem ;

LEXICON subjectX !To help limit overproduction
%<s_sg1%>:nu stem ;
%<s_sg2%>:a stem ;
%<s_sg3%>:u stem ;
%<s_pl1%>:qa stem ;
%<s_pl2%>:i stem ;
%<s_pl3%>:ki stem ;

LEXICON subjectXoj !To help limit overproduction
%<s_sg2%>:a stem ;
%<s_sg3%>:tu stem ;
%<s_pl2%>:'i stem ;
%<s_pl3%>:ki stem ;

LEXICON subjectXe !To help limit overproduction
%<s_sg1%>:nu stem ;
%<s_sg2%>:a stem ;
%<s_sg3%>:ru stem ;
%<s_pl1%>:qa stem ;
%<s_pl2%>:'i stem ;
%<s_pl3%>:ki stem ;

LEXICON stem
tz'ät%<v%>%<tv%>:tz'ät # ;
